Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.426

Office of the corrections ombuds—Repeal.

The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, 2029:

(1) RCW 43.06C.005 and 2018 c 270 s 1;

(2) RCW 43.06C.020 and 2018 c 270 s 2;

(3) RCW 43.06C.010 and 2018 c 270 s 3;

(4) RCW 43.06C.030 and 2018 c 270 s 4;

(5) RCW 43.06C.040 and 2018 c 270 s 5;

(6) RCW 43.06C.050 and 2018 c 270 s 6;

(7) RCW 43.06C.060 and 2018 c 270 s 7; and

(8) RCW 43.06C.070 and 2018 c 270 s 8.

[ 2018 c 270 s 11.]